Tennessee, session 114, HB0594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-102(8)(B), is amended by
adding the language "or a bona fide religious institution" immediately after the language
"volunteer fire department".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0594
002138
- 1 -